Maryland, session 2026, HB1171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–701.
(a) (1) The Howard County Board consists of:
(i) Seven elected members; and
(ii) One student member.
(f) (7) The student member shall vote on all matters except those relating to:
(i) [Geographical attendance areas under § 4–109 of this article;
(ii) Acquisition and disposition of real property and matters
pertaining to school construction under § 4–115 of this article;
– 1 –

Ch. 578 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii)] Employment of architects under § 4–117 of this article;
[(iv) Donations under § 4–118 of this article;
(v) Condemnation under § 4–119 of this article;
(vi) Consolidation of schools and transportation of students under §
4–120 of this article;
(vii)] (II) Appointment and salary of a county superintendent under
§§ 4–201 and 4–202 of this article;
[(viii)] (III) Employee discipline and other appeals under § 4–205(c) of
this article;
[(ix) Budgetary matters under Title 5 of this article;
(x)] (IV) Appointment and promotion of staff under § 6–201 of this
article;
[(xi)] (V) Discipline of certificated staff under § 6–202 of this article;
[(xii)] (VI) Collective bargaining for certificated employees under
Title 6, Subtitle 4 of this article; AND
[(xiii)] (VII) Collective bargaining for noncertificated employees under
Title 6, Subtitle 5 of this article[; and
(xiv) Student suspension and expulsion under § 7–305 of this article].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –